Utah statutes.
48-1-10.   Partnership bound by partner's wrongful act.
Where by any wrongful act or omission of any partner acting in the ordinary
course of the business of the partnership or with the authority of his
copartners loss or injury is caused to any person, not being a partner in the
partnership, or any penalty is incurred, the partnership is liable therefor to
the same extent as the partner so acting or omitting to act.
